Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1158.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 108. Designation of Election Day as Legal Holiday.--The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November, known as Election Day, is designated a legal holiday in this Commonwealth.123456789101112131415161718192021222324 Section 2. Section 527(a) of the act is amended to read:Section 527. Public Buildings to Be Used Where Possible; Portable Polling Places.--(a) In selecting polling places, the county board of elections shall, wherever possible and practicable, select schoolhouses, municipal buildings or rooms, or other public buildings for that purpose. Any board of public education or school directors, or county or the municipal authorities shall[, upon request of the county board,] make arrangements for the use of school property, or of county or municipal property for polling places. In selecting polling places, the county board of elections shall make every effort to select polling places that provide all electors with an environment that is free from intimidation and violence.In the event no available public building as contemplated under this section is situated within the boundaries of any election district, the county board of elections may, not less than twenty days prior to any election, designate as the polling place for such election district any such public building situated in another election district within the same or immediately adjacent ward, or, if there are no wards, then within the same borough or township as the case may be, provided such other building is located in an election district which is immediately adjacent to the boundary of the election district for which it is to be the polling place and is directly accessible therefrom by public street or thoroughfare. Two or more polling places may be located in the same public building under this section. A polling place may be selected and designated hereunder less than twenty days prior to any election, with the approval of a court of competent jurisdiction.20250HB1158PN1285 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1158PN1285 - 3 - 12